Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.155.040

Authority of districts—Participation of department of social and health services.

The board of directors of each school district, for the purpose of compliance with the provisions of RCW 28A.150.390, 28A.160.030, and 28A.155.010 through 28A.155.160 and chapter 28A.190 RCW, shall cooperate with the superintendent of public instruction and with the administrative officer and shall provide an appropriate educational opportunity to children with disabilities, as defined in RCW 28A.155.020, in regular or special school facilities within the district or shall contract for such services with other agencies as provided in RCW 28A.155.060 or shall participate in an interdistrict arrangement in accordance with RCW 28A.335.160 and 28A.225.220 and/or 28A.225.250 and 28A.225.260.

In carrying out their responsibilities under this chapter, school districts severally or jointly with the approval of the superintendent of public instruction are authorized to support and/or contract for residential schools and/or homes approved by the department of social and health services for aid and special attention to students with disabilities.

The cost of board and room in facilities approved by the department of social and health services shall be provided by the department of social and health services for those students with disabilities eligible for such aid under programs of the department. The cost of approved board and room shall be provided for those students with disabilities not eligible under programs of the department of social and health services but deemed in need of the same by the superintendent of public instruction: PROVIDED, That no school district shall be financially responsible for special education programs for students who are attending residential schools operated by the department of social and health services: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the provisions of RCW 28A.150.390, 28A.160.030, and 28A.155.010 through 28A.155.100 shall not preclude the extension by the superintendent of public instruction of special education opportunities to students with disabilities in residential schools operated by the department of social and health services.

[ 2007 c 115 s 4; 1995 c 77 s 10; 1990 c 33 s 123; 1971 ex.s. c 66 s 4; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.13.030. Prior: 1959 c 122 s 1; 1953 c 135 s 1; 1943 c 120 s 4; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 4679-28. Formerly RCW 28A.13.030, 28.13.030.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective date—1971 ex.s. c 66: See notes following RCW 28A.155.010.